Utah statutes.
72-4-113.   State highways -- SR-71 to SR-80.

State highways include:

(1)  SR-71.  From Route 154 in Riverton easterly to Seventh East Street in Draper; then northerly on Seventh East and Ninth East Streets to Route 186 in Salt Lake City.

(2)  SR-72.  From Route 24 in Loa northerly to a junction with Route 70 and Route 10 near Fremont Junction.

(3)  SR-73.  From Route 36 northeast of St. John Station southeasterly on Five Mile Pass to Route 68; then easterly again beginning at 850 East in Lehi to Route 89.

(4)  SR-74.  From Route 89 in American Fork northerly to 200 feet south of the intersection with Canyon Crest Road in Alpine.

(5)  SR-75.  From Route 15 northwest of Springville easterly to Route 89 near Ironton.

(6)  SR-76.  From Route 70 easterly to old Fremont Junction on Route 72.

(7)  SR-77.  From Route 147 north of Benjamin north through Barney Corner; then easterly to Route 89 in Springville.

(8)  SR-78.  From Route 15 at the Mills Junction Interchange northerly to west of Levan; then east to Route 28 in Levan.

(9)  SR-79.  From Route 108 easterly on Thirty-first Street in Ogden to the lane separation, then on eastbound lane only to Route 89; then easterly on Thirtieth Street to Route 203; beginning again at Thirtieth Street and Route 89 then westerly on the westbound lane only to merge with eastbound lanes.

(10)  SR-80.  From the Utah-Nevada state line in Wendover to the Utah-Wyoming state line west of Evanston, Wyoming, on Interstate 80.



Amended by Chapter 336, 2012 General Session

